New York, session 2025-2026, A808.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 507 to read as follows: 3 § 507. Drug checking services program. 1. For purposes of this 4 section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Enhanced drug checking services" means the utilization of all 6 forms of drug testing equipment including complex technology or equip- 7 ment designed to analyze substances and provide results at point of 8 testing or point of care, which may include but is not limited to, chem- 9 ical screening devices such as infrared spectrophotometers, raman spec- 10 trophotometers, or ion mobility spectrometers. 11 (b) "Public health surveillance" means the continuous and systematic 12 collection, analysis, and interpretation of data needed for the plan- 13 ning, implementation, and evaluation of public health initiatives. 14 Public health surveillance may be used for the following purposes: 15 (i) as an early warning system for impending public health emergen- 16 cies; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00379-13-5 A. 808--C 2 1 (ii) to document the impact of an intervention; 2 (iii) to track progress towards specific goals; 3 (iv) to monitor and clarify the epidemiology of health outcomes; and 4 (v) to inform the public health policy and practices. 5 2. The department shall: 6 (a) establish a program to authorize a county or municipality or other 7 entity to provide enhanced drug checking services to assist individuals 8 in determining whether a drug or controlled substance contains contam- 9 inants, toxic substances, or hazardous compounds; and 10 (b) establish public health surveillance of the unregulated drug 11 supply to monitor trends and the impact on health outcomes and increase 12 public awareness of new substances in the unregulated drug supply. 13 3. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations for the 14 provision of enhanced drug checking services which shall include but not 15 be limited to: 16 (a) providing information and harm reduction advice to help individ- 17 uals make informed decisions about drug use; 18 (b) testing any drug or substance that an individual presents for 19 checking to ascertain the composition and likely identity of such drug 20 or substance; 21 (c) advising the individual who presented a drug or substance for 22 checking of the results of the testing; 23 (d) disposing of, or arranging for the disposal of, any sample of a 24 drug or substance used in testing and any drug or substance surrendered 25 by any individual for disposal; and 26 (e) if necessary, arranging for a sample of a drug or substance to be 27 tested by a department approved laboratory. 28 4. The department shall develop policies and procedures to: 29 (a) utilize enhanced drug checking technology for public health 30 surveillance; 31 (b) develop requirements for technician training to ensure accurate 32 point-of-testing and point-of-care results; 33 (c) identify appropriate equipment to use; and 34 (d) establish reporting processes. 35 5. Employees, contractors, and volunteers of the department, direc- 36 tors, managers, employees, contractors, and volunteers of an entity 37 providing drug checking services, owners of properties where drug check- 38 ing services occur, counties, municipalities or other entities author- 39 ized by the department, and individuals presenting drugs or substances 40 for checking, acting in the course and scope of employment or engaged in 41 good faith in the provision of enhanced drug checking services, in 42 accordance with established protocols, shall not be subject to: 43 (a) arrest, charges, or prosecution pursuant to article thirty-three 44 of this chapter or any violation or misdemeanor, including for attempt- 45 ing, aiding and abetting, or conspiracy to commit a violation or misde- 46 meanor pursuant to article two hundred twenty of the penal law; or 47 (b) a civil or administrative penalty or liability of any kind, or 48 disciplinary action by a professional licensing board, for conduct 49 relating to the provision of authorized drug checking services unless 50 such conduct was performed in a negligent manner or in bad faith. 51 6. The department and entities authorized by the department shall not 52 collect, maintain, use, or disclose any personal information relating to 53 an individual from whom the department or other authorized entity 54 receives any drug or substance for checking or disposal. 55 7. The result of any test carried out by the department or an author- 56 ized entity in relation to any drug or substance presented for checking A. 808--C 3 1 shall not be admissible as evidence in any criminal or civil proceedings 2 against the individual from whom the drug or substance was received, 3 unless submitted by such individual. 4 8. The commissioner shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are 5 necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. 6 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 3305 of the public health law, as 7 amended by chapter 547 of the laws of 1981, paragraph (d) as amended by 8 chapter 635 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read as follows: 9 1. The provisions of this article restricting the possession and 10 control of controlled substances and official New York state 11 prescription forms shall not apply: 12 (a) to common carriers or to [warehousemen] warehouse workers while 13 engaged in lawfully transporting or storing such substances, or to any 14 employee of the same acting within the scope of [his] their employment; 15 or 16 (b) to public officers or their employees in the lawful performance of 17 their official duties requiring possession or control of controlled 18 substances; or 19 (c) to temporary incidental possession by employees or agents of 20 persons lawfully entitled to possession, or by persons whose possession 21 is for the purpose of aiding public officers in performing their offi- 22 cial duties[.]; or 23 (d) to employees, contractors, and volunteers of the department, 24 directors, managers, employees, contractors, and volunteers of an entity 25 providing drug checking services authorized under section five hundred 26 seven of this chapter, owners of properties where such authorized drug 27 checking services occur, counties, municipalities, or other entities 28 authorized by the department, and individuals presenting drugs or 29 substances for checking, acting in the course and scope of employment or 30 engaged in good faith in the provision of authorized drug checking 31 services, in accordance with established protocols; or 32 (e) to a duly authorized agent of an incorporated society for the 33 prevention of cruelty to animals or a municipal animal control facility 34 for the limited purpose of buying, possessing, and dispensing to regis- 35 tered and certified personnel, ketamine hydrochloride to anesthetize 36 animals and/or sodium pentobarbital to euthanize animals, including but 37 not limited to dogs and cats. The department shall, consistent with the 38 public interest, register such duly authorized agent and such agent 39 shall file, on a quarterly basis, a report of purchase, possession, and 40 use of ketamine hydrochloride and/or sodium pentobarbital, which report 41 shall be certified by the society for the prevention of cruelty to 42 animals or municipal animal control facility as to its accuracy and 43 validity. This report shall be in addition to any other record keeping 44 and reporting requirements of state and federal law and regulation. The 45 department shall adopt rules and regulations providing for the registra- 46 tion and certification of any individual who, under the direction of the 47 duly authorized and registered agent of an incorporated society for the 48 prevention of cruelty to animals, or municipal animal control facility, 49 uses ketamine hydrochloride to anesthetize animals and/or sodium pento- 50 barbital to euthanize animals, including but not limited to dogs and 51 cats. The department may also adopt such other rules and regulations as 52 shall provide for the safe and efficient use of ketamine hydrochloride 53 and/or sodium pentobarbital by incorporated societies for the prevention 54 of cruelty to animals and animal control facilities. Nothing in this 55 paragraph shall be deemed to waive any other requirement imposed on A. 808--C 4 1 incorporated societies for the prevention of cruelty to animals and 2 animal control facilities by state and federal law and regulation. 3 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 4 subdivisions four and eight of section 507 of the public health law, as 5 added by section one of this act, shall take effect on the ninetieth day 6 after it shall have become a law.